Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1609.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 section to read:Section 626. Essential Service Payments During Budget Impasse.--(a) If the General Appropriation Act is not enacted by July 1 of any fiscal year:(1) The Secretary of the Budget shall, in consultation with the Secretary of Human Services, the Secretary of Drug and Alcohol Programs , the Secretary of Aging and the secretary of a department that provides other essential services, certify to the State Treasurer the line items and amounts paid for essential services and other essential services from each of their departments during the prior fiscal year and the amounts so certified are hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the respective departments for those purposes.(2) The Department of Human Services, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs , the Department of Aging and any department that provides other essential services may submit requisitions to the State Treasurer for the payment of the essential services and other essential services to a human services organization, county or other intermediary organization from the appropriations made under paragraph (1), provided that the amount paid does not exceed the amount paid during the prior fiscal year.(b) The amount paid from the General Fund under subsection (a) between July 1 and the effective date of the General Appropriation Act for that fiscal year shall be credited against the corresponding appropriation in the General Appropriation Act for that fiscal year.(c) An appropriation made under subsection (a) in any fiscal year shall immediately lapse when the General Appropriation Act for that fiscal year is enacted.20250HB1609PN1924 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) The Secretary of the Budget and the State Treasurer shall expedite payments under this section consistent with their powers and duties in the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code."(e) The Secretary of the Budget shall submit a report to the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives by June 15 of each year indicating any services that will be deemed essential by the Governor to protect public health and safety during a potential budget impasse.(f) As used in this section, the term "essential service" means any service for which payment was made during the previous fiscal year from Federal and State appropriations to the Department of Human Services, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs and the Department of Aging for the following:(1) Domestic violence.(2) Mental health services, including grants to counties or other county-based human services included under the Human Services Block Grant, exclusive of capital improvements.(3) Behavioral health services or other county-based human services included under the Human Services Block Grant.(4) Intellectual Disabilities - Community Base Program, including grants to counties for noninstitutional programs or other county-based human services included under the Human Services Block Grant, exclusive of capital improvements.(5) Payments and services to counties for children and youth programs and for the care of delinquent and dependent children under section 704.1 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code." The payments and services shall include an aggregate child welfare needs-based budget 20250HB1609PN1924 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 allocation that the Department of Human Services may use to fund contracts for adoption services and to pay for assistance to counties in meeting Federal reimbursement documentation requirements.(6) The Human Services Development Fund.(7) Medical assistance payments for outpatient services, exclusive of outpatient services provided through capitation plans.(8) Payments to counties for drug and alcohol addiction treatment services under section 2334.(9) Any other funds for which the county provides services on behalf of the Commonwealth.(g) As used in this section, the term "other essential services" means services for which payment was made during the previous fiscal year from Federal and State appropriations that the Governor deems essential during a budget impasse for public health and safety. The term does not include an essential service.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1609PN1924 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819